North Carolina, session 2025, SB20.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 52 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 14-401.28. Release of certain balloons.
(a) Finding. – The General Assembly finds that the release into the atmosphere of
balloons inflated with lighter-than-air gases poses a harm to the scenic beauty of the State and a
danger and nuisance to wildlife and marine animals.
(b) Offense. – It is unlawful for any person to organize or participate in a balloon release.
(c) Penalty. – A violation of this section shall be an infraction and shall be punishable by
a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00).
(d) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Balloon. – A nonporous bag of tough and light material, such as latex or mylar,
filled with helium or another substance that causes the balloons to rise or float
in the atmosphere.
(2) Balloon release. – The knowing and intentional release of balloons by a person
or through the operation of a device controlled by a person, except for any of
the following:
a. Balloons released by a person on behalf of a government agency or
pursuant to a contract for scientific or meteorological purposes.
b. Hot air balloons that are recovered after launching."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
*S20-v-1*